Florida, session 2026, SB1354.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraphs (b), (p), (q), and (s) of subsection 13 (3), paragraph (d) of subsection (9), paragraphs (b) and (c) of 14 subsection (10), and subsection (11) of section 627.6699, 15 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 16 627.6699âEmployee Health Care Access Act.â 17 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 18 (b)ââBoardâ means the board of directors of the program. 19 (p)ââPlan of operationâ means the plan of operation of the 20 program, including articles, bylaws, and operating rules, 21 adopted by the board under subsection (11). 22 (q)ââProgramâ means the Florida Small Employer Carrier 23 Reinsurance Program created under subsection (11). 24 (p)(s)ââReinsuring carrierâ means a small employer carrier 25 that elects to comply with reinsurance the requirements set 26 forth in subsection (11). 27 (9)âSMALL EMPLOYER CARRIERâS ELECTION TO BECOME A RISK 28 ASSUMING CARRIER OR A REINSURING CARRIER.â 29 (d)âA small employer carrier that elects to cease 30 participating as a reinsuring carrier and to become a risk 31 assuming carrier is prohibited from reinsuring or continuing to 32 reinsure any small employer health benefits plan under 33 subsection (11) as soon as the carrier becomes a risk-assuming 34 carrier and must pay a prorated assessment based upon business 35 issued as a reinsuring carrier for any portion of the year that 36 the business was reinsured. A small employer carrier that elects 37 to cease participating as a risk-assuming carrier and to become 38 a reinsuring carrier is permitted to reinsure small employer 39 health benefit plans under the terms set forth in subsection 40 (11) and must pay a prorated assessment based upon business 41 issued as a reinsuring carrier for any portion of the year that 42 the business was reinsured. 43 (10)âELECTION PROCESS TO BECOME A RISK-ASSUMING CARRIER.â 44 (b)âIn determining whether to approve an application by a 45 small employer carrier to become a risk-assuming carrier, the 46 office shall consider: 47 1.âThe carrierâs financial ability to support the 48 assumption of the risk of small employer groups. 49 2.âThe carrierâs history of rating and underwriting small 50 employer groups. 51 3.âThe carrierâs commitment to market fairly to all small 52 employers in the state or its service area, as applicable. 53 4.âThe carrierâs ability to assume and manage the risk of 54 enrolling small employer groups without the protection of the 55 reinsurance program provided in subsection (11). 56 (c)âA small employer carrier that becomes a risk-assuming 57 carrier pursuant to this subsection is not subject to 58 reinsurance the assessment provisions of subsection (11). 59 (11)âSMALL EMPLOYER HEALTH REINSURANCE PROGRAM.â 60 (a)âThere is created a nonprofit entity to be known as the 61 âFlorida Small Employer Health Reinsurance Program.â 62 (b)1.âThe program shall operate subject to the supervision 63 and control of the board. 64 2.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, the board shall 65 consist of the director of the office or his or her designee, 66 who shall serve as the chairperson, and 13 additional members 67 who are representatives of carriers and insurance agents and are 68 appointed by the director of the office and serve as follows: 69 a.âFive members shall be representatives of health insurers 70 licensed under chapter 624 or chapter 641. Two members shall be 71 agents who are actively engaged in the sale of health insurance. 72 Four members shall be employers or representatives of employers. 73 One member shall be a person covered under an individual health 74 insurance policy issued by a licensed insurer in this state. One 75 member shall represent the Agency for Health Care Administration 76 and shall be recommended by the Secretary of Health Care 77 Administration. 78 b.âA member appointed under this subparagraph shall serve a 79 term of 4 years and shall continue in office until the memberâs 80 successor takes office, except that, in order to provide for 81 staggered terms, the director of the office shall designate two 82 of the initial appointees under this subparagraph to serve terms 83 of 2 years and shall designate three of the initial appointees 84 under this subparagraph to serve terms of 3 years. 85 3.âThe director of the office may remove a member for 86 cause. 87 4.âVacancies on the board shall be filled in the same 88 manner as the original appointment for the unexpired portion of 89 the term. 90 (c)1.âThe board shall submit to the office a plan of 91 operation to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable 92 administration of the program. The board may at any time submit 93 to the office any amendments to the plan that the board finds to 94 be necessary or suitable. 95 2.âThe office shall, after notice and hearing, approve the 96 plan of operation if it determines that the plan submitted by 97 the board is suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and 98 equitable administration of the program and provides for the 99 sharing of program gains and losses equitably and 100 proportionately in accordance with paragraph (j). 101 3.âThe plan of operation, or any amendment thereto, becomes 102 effective upon written approval of the office. 103 (d)âThe plan of operation must, among other things: 104 1.âEstablish procedures for handling and accounting for 105 program assets and moneys and for an annual fiscal reporting to 106 the office. 107 2.âEstablish procedures for selecting an administering 108 carrier and set forth the powers and duties of the administering 109 carrier. 110 3.âEstablish procedures for reinsuring risks. 111 4.âEstablish procedures for collecting assessments from 112 participating carriers to provide for claims reinsured by the 113 program and for administrative expenses, other than amounts 114 payable to the administrative carrier, incurred or estimated to 115 be incurred during the period for which the assessment is made. 116 5.âProvide for any additional matters at the discretion of 117 the board. 118 (e)âThe board shall recommend to the office market conduct 119 requirements and other requirements for carriers and agents, 120 including requirements relating to: 121 1.âRegistration by each carrier with the office of its 122 intention to be a small employer carrier under this section; 123 2.âPublication by the office of a list of all small 124 employer carriers, including a requirement applicable to agents 125 and carriers that a health benefit plan may not be sold by a 126 carrier that is not identified as a small employer carrier; 127 3.âThe availability of a broadly publicized, toll-free 128 telephone number for access by small employers to information 129 concerning this section; 130 4.âPeriodic reports by carriers and agents concerning 131 health benefit plans issued; and 132 5.âMethods concerning periodic demonstration by small 133 employer carriers and agents that they are marketing or issuing 134 health benefit plans to small employers. 135 (f)âThe program has the general powers and authority 136 granted under the laws of this state to insurance companies and 137 health maintenance organizations licensed to transact business, 138 except the power to issue health benefit plans directly to 139 groups or individuals. In addition thereto, the program has 140 specific authority to: 141 1.âEnter into contracts as necessary or proper to carry out 142 the provisions and purposes of this act, including the authority 143 to enter into contracts with similar programs of other states 144 for the joint performance of common functions or with persons or 145 other organizations for the performance of administrative 146 functions. 147 2.âSue or be sued, including taking any legal action 148 necessary or proper for recovering any assessments and penalties 149 for, on behalf of, or against the program or any carrier. 150 3.âTake any legal action necessary to avoid the payment of 151 improper claims against the program. 152 4.âIssue reinsurance policies, in accordance with the 153 requirements of this act. 154 5.âEstablish rules, conditions, and procedures for 155 reinsurance risks under the program participation. 156 6.âEstablish actuarial functions as appropriate for the 157 operation of the program. 158 7.âAssess participating carriers in accordance with 159 paragraph (j), and make advance interim assessments as may be 160 reasonable and necessary for organizational and interim 161 operating expenses. Interim assessments shall be credited as 162 offsets against any regular assessments due following the close 163 of the calendar year. 164 8.âAppoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other 165 committees as necessary to provide technical assistance in the 166 operation of the program, and in any other function within the 167 authority of the program. 168 9.âBorrow money to effect the purposes of the program. Any 169 notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the program which 170 are not in default constitute legal investments for carriers and 171 may be carried as admitted assets. 172 10.âTo the extent necessary, increase the $5,000 deductible 173 reinsurance requirement to adjust for the effects of inflation. 174 (g)âA reinsuring carrier may reinsure with the program 175 coverage of an eligible employee of a small employer, or any 176 dependent of such an employee, subject to each of the following 177 provisions: 178 1.âExcept in the case of a late enrollee, a reinsuring 179 carrier may reinsure an eligible employee or dependent within 60 180 days after the commencement of the coverage of the small 181 employer. A newly employed eligible employee or dependent of a 182 small employer may be reinsured within 60 days after the 183 commencement of his or her coverage. 184 2.âA small employer carrier may reinsure an entire employer 185 group within 60 days after the commencement of the groupâs 186 coverage under the plan. 187 3.âThe program may not reimburse a participating carrier 188 with respect to the claims of a reinsured employee or dependent 189 until the carrier has paid incurred claims of at least $5,000 in 190 a calendar year for benefits covered by the program. In 191 addition, the reinsuring carrier shall be responsible for 10 192 percent of the next $50,000 and 5 percent of the next $100,000 193 of incurred claims during a calendar year and the program shall 194 reinsure the remainder. 195 4.âThe board annually shall adjust the initial level of 196 claims and the maximum limit to be retained by the carrier to 197 reflect increases in costs and utilization within the standard 198 market for health benefit plans within the state. The adjustment 199 shall not be less than the annual change in the medical 200 component of the âConsumer Price Index for All Urban Consumersâ 201 of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the Department of Labor, 202 unless the board proposes and the office approves a lower 203 adjustment factor. 204 5.âA small employer carrier may terminate reinsurance for 205 all reinsured employees or dependents on any plan anniversary. 206 6.âThe premium rate charged for reinsurance by the program 207 to a health maintenance organization that is approved by the 208 Secretary of Health and Human Services as a federally qualified 209 health maintenance organization pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s. 210 300e(c)(2)(A) and that, as such, is subject to requirements that 211 limit the amount of risk that may be ceded to the program, which 212 requirements are more restrictive than subparagraph 3., shall be 213 reduced by an amount equal to that portion of the risk, if any, 214 which exceeds the amount set forth in subparagraph 3. which may 215 not be ceded to the program. 216 7.âThe board may consider adjustments to the premium rates 217 charged for reinsurance by the program for carriers that use 218 effective cost containment measures, including high-cost case 219 management, as defined by the board. 220 8.âA reinsuring carrier shall apply its case-management and 221 claims-handling techniques, including, but not limited to, 222 utilization review, individual case management, preferred 223 provider provisions, other managed care provisions or methods of 224 operation, consistently with both reinsured business and 225 nonreinsured business. 226 (h)1.âThe board, as part of the plan of operation, shall 227 establish a methodology for determining premium rates to be 228 charged by the program for reinsuring small employers and 229 individuals pursuant to this section. The methodology shall 230 include a system for classification of small employers that 231 reflects the types of case characteristics commonly used by 232 small employer carriers in the state. The methodology shall 233 provide for the development of basic reinsurance premium rates, 234 which shall be multiplied by the factors set for them in this 235 paragraph to determine the premium rates for the program. The 236 basic reinsurance premium rates shall be established by the 237 board, subject to the approval of the office. The premium rates 238 set by the board may vary by geographical area, as determined 239 under this section, to reflect differences in cost. The 240 multiplying factors must be established as follows: 241 a.âThe entire group may be reinsured for a rate that is 1.5 242 times the rate established by the board. 243 b.âAn eligible employee or dependent may be reinsured for a 244 rate that is 5 times the rate established by the board. 245 2.âThe board periodically shall review the methodology 246 established, including the system of classification and any 247 rating factors, to assure that it reasonably reflects the claims 248 experience of the program. The board may propose changes to the 249 rates which shall be subject to the approval of the office. 250 (i)âIf a health benefit plan for a small employer issued in 251 accordance with this subsection is entirely or partially 252 reinsured with the program, the premium charged to the small 253 employer for any rating period for the coverage issued must be 254 consistent with the requirements relating to premium rates set 255 forth in this section. 256 (j)1.âBefore July 1 of each calendar year, the board shall 257 determine and report to the office the program net loss for the 258 previous year, including administrative expenses for that year, 259 and the incurred losses for the year, taking into account 260 investment income and other appropriate gains and losses. 261 2.âAny net loss for the year shall be recouped by 262 assessment of the carriers, as follows: 263 a.âThe operating losses of the program shall be assessed in 264 the following order subject to the specified limitations. The 265 first tier of assessments shall be made against reinsuring 266 carriers in an amount which shall not exceed 5 percent of each 267 reinsuring carrierâs premiums from health benefit plans covering 268 small employers. If such assessments have been collected and 269 additional moneys are needed, the board shall make a second tier 270 of assessments in an amount which shall not exceed 0.5 percent 271 of each carrierâs health benefit plan premiums. Except as 272 provided in paragraph (m), risk-assuming carriers are exempt 273 from all assessments authorized pursuant to this section. The 274 amount paid by a reinsuring carrier for the first tier of 275 assessments shall be credited against any additional assessments 276 made. 277 b.âThe board shall equitably assess carriers for operating 278 losses of the plan based on market share. The board shall 279 annually assess each carrier a portion of the operating losses 280 of the plan. The first tier of assessments shall be determined 281 by multiplying the operating losses by a fraction, the numerator 282 of which equals the reinsuring carrierâs earned premium 283 pertaining to direct writings of small employer health benefit 284 plans in the state during the calendar year for which the 285 assessment is levied, and the denominator of which equals the 286 total of all such premiums earned by reinsuring carriers in the 287 state during that calendar year. The second tier of assessments 288 shall be based on the premiums that all carriers, except risk 289 assuming carriers, earned on all health benefit plans written in 290 this state. The board may levy interim assessments against 291 carriers to ensure the financial ability of the plan to cover 292 claims expenses and administrative expenses paid or estimated to 293 be paid in the operation of the plan for the calendar year prior 294 to the associationâs anticipated receipt of annual assessments 295 for that calendar year. Any interim assessment is due and 296 payable within 30 days after receipt by a carrier of the interim 297 assessment notice. Interim assessment payments shall be credited 298 against the carrierâs annual assessment. Health benefit plan 299 premiums and benefits paid by a carrier that are less than an 300 amount determined by the board to justify the cost of collection 301 may not be considered for purposes of determining assessments. 302 c.âSubject to the approval of the office, the board shall 303 make an adjustment to the assessment formula for reinsuring 304 carriers that are approved as federally qualified health 305 maintenance organizations by the Secretary of Health and Human 306 Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s. 300e(c)(2)(A) to the extent, 307 if any, that restrictions are placed on them that are not 308 imposed on other small employer carriers. 309 3.âBefore July 1 of each year, the board shall determine 310 and file with the office an estimate of the assessments needed 311 to fund the losses incurred by the program in the previous 312 calendar year. 313 4.âIf the board determines that the assessments needed to 314 fund the losses incurred by the program in the previous calendar 315 year will exceed the amount specified in subparagraph 2., the 316 board shall evaluate the operation of the program and report its 317 findings, including any recommendations for changes to the plan 318 of operation, to the office within 180 days following the end of 319 the calendar year in which the losses were incurred. The 320 evaluation shall include an estimate of future assessments, the 321 administrative costs of the program, the appropriateness of the 322 premiums charged and the level of carrier retention under the 323 program, and the costs of coverage for small employers. If the 324 board fails to file a report with the office within 180 days 325 following the end of the applicable calendar year, the office 326 may evaluate the operations of the program and implement such 327 amendments to the plan of operation the office deems necessary 328 to reduce future losses and assessments. 329 5.âIf assessments exceed the amount of the actual losses 330 and administrative expenses of the program, the excess shall be 331 held as interest and used by the board to offset future losses 332 or to reduce program premiums. As used in this paragraph, the 333 term âfuture lossesâ includes reserves for incurred but not 334 reported claims. 335 6.âEach carrierâs proportion of the assessment shall be 336 determined annually by the board, based on annual statements and 337 other reports considered necessary by the board and filed by the 338 carriers with the board. 339 7.âProvision shall be made in the plan of operation for the 340 imposition of an interest penalty for late payment of an 341 assessment. 342 8.âA carrier may seek, from the office, a deferment, in 343 whole or in part, from any assessment made by the board. The 344 office may defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a 345 carrier if, in the opinion of the office, the payment of the 346 assessment would place the carrier in a financially impaired 347 condition. If an assessment against a carrier is deferred, in 348 whole or in part, the amount by which the assessment is deferred 349 may be assessed against the other carriers in a manner 350 consistent with the basis for assessment set forth in this 351 section. The carrier receiving such deferment remains liable to 352 the program for the amount deferred and is prohibited from 353 reinsuring any individuals or groups in the program if it fails 354 to pay assessments. 355 (k)âNeither the participation in the program as reinsuring 356 carriers, the establishment of rates, forms, or procedures, nor 357 any other joint or collective action required by this act, may 358 be the basis of any legal action, criminal or civil liability, 359 or penalty against the program or any of its carriers either 360 jointly or separately. 361 (l)âThe board shall monitor compliance with this section, 362 including the market conduct of small employer carriers, and 363 shall report to the office any unfair trade practices and 364 misleading or unfair conduct by a small employer carrier that 365 has been reported to the board by agents, consumers, or any 366 other person. The office shall investigate all reports and, upon 367 a finding of noncompliance with this section or of unfair or 368 misleading practices, shall take action against the small 369 employer carrier as permitted under the insurance code or 370 chapter 641. The board is not given investigatory or regulatory 371 powers, but must forward all reports of cases or abuse or 372 misrepresentation to the office. 373 (m)âNotwithstanding paragraph (j), the administrative 374 expenses of the program shall be recouped by assessment of risk 375 assuming carriers and reinsuring carriers and such amounts shall 376 not be considered part of the operating losses of the plan for 377 the purposes of this paragraph. Each carrierâs portion of such 378 administrative expenses shall be determined by multiplying the 379 total of such administrative expenses by a fraction, the 380 numerator of which equals the carrierâs earned premium 381 pertaining to direct writing of small employer health benefit 382 plans in the state during the calendar year for which the 383 assessment is levied, and the denominator of which equals the 384 total of such premiums earned by all carriers in the state 385 during such calendar year. 386 (n)âThe board shall advise the office, the Agency for 387 Health Care Administration, the department, other executive 388 departments, and the Legislature on health insurance issues. 389 Specifically, the board shall: 390 1.âProvide a forum for stakeholders, consisting of 391 insurers, employers, agents, consumers, and regulators, in the 392 private health insurance market in this state. 393 2.âReview and recommend strategies to improve the 394 functioning of the health insurance markets in this state with a 395 specific focus on market stability, access, and pricing. 396 3.âMake recommendations to the office for legislation 397 addressing health insurance market issues and provide comments 398 on health insurance legislation proposed by the office. 399 4.âMeet at least three times each year. One meeting shall 400 be held to hear reports and to secure public comment on the 401 health insurance market, to develop any legislation needed to 402 address health insurance market issues, and to provide comments 403 on health insurance legislation proposed by the office. 404 5.âIssue a report to the office on the state of the health 405 insurance market by September 1 each year. The report shall 406 include recommendations for changes in the health insurance 407 market, results from implementation of previous recommendations, 408 and information on health insurance markets. 409 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 627.642, Florida 410 Statutes, is amended to read: 411 627.642âOutline of coverage.â 412 (3)âIn addition to the outline of coverage, a policy as 413 specified in s. 627.6699(3)(j) s. 627.6699(3)(k) must be 414 accompanied by an identification card that contains, at a 415 minimum: 416 (a)âThe name of the organization issuing the policy or the 417 name of the organization administering the policy, whichever 418 applies. 419 (b)âThe name of the contract holder. 420 (c)âThe type of plan only if the plan is filed in the 421 state, an indication that the plan is self-funded, or the name 422 of the network. 423 (d)âThe member identification number, contract number, and 424 policy or group number, if applicable. 425 (e)âA contact phone number or electronic address for 426 authorizations and admission certifications. 427 (f)âA phone number or electronic address whereby the 428 covered person or hospital, physician, or other person rendering 429 services covered by the policy may obtain benefits verification 430 and information in order to estimate patient financial 431 responsibility, in compliance with privacy rules under the 432 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act. 433 (g)âThe national plan identifier, in accordance with the 434 compliance date set forth by the federal Department of Health 435 and Human Services. 436 437 The identification card must present the information in a 438 readily identifiable manner or, alternatively, the information 439 may be embedded on the card and available through magnetic 440 stripe or smart card. The information may also be provided 441 through other electronic technology. 442 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2), paragraphs (a), 443 (e), and (g) of subsection (7), and paragraph (a) of subsection 444 (8) of section 627.6475, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 445 627.6475âIndividual reinsurance pool.â 446 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section: 447 (a)ââBoard,â âCarrier,â and âhealth benefit planâ have the 448 same meaning ascribed in s. 627.6699(3). 449 (7)âINDIVIDUAL HEALTH REINSURANCE PROGRAM.â 450 (a)âThe individual health reinsurance program shall operate 451 subject to the supervision and control of the board of the small 452 employer health reinsurance program established pursuant to s. 453 627.6699(11). The board shall establish a separate, segregated 454 account for eligible individuals reinsured pursuant to this 455 section, which account may not be commingled with the small 456 employer health reinsurance account. 457 (e)1.âBefore March 1 of each calendar year, the board shall 458 determine and report to the office the program net loss in the 459 individual account for the previous year, including 460 administrative expenses for that year and the incurred losses 461 for that year, taking into account investment income and other 462 appropriate gains and losses. 463 2.âAny net loss in the individual account for the year 464 shall be recouped by assessing the carriers as follows: 465 a.âThe operating losses of the program shall be assessed in 466 the following order subject to the specified limitations. The 467 first tier of assessments shall be made against reinsuring 468 carriers in an amount that may not exceed 5 percent of each 469 reinsuring carrierâs premiums for individual health insurance. 470 If such assessments have been collected and additional moneys 471 are needed, the board shall make a second tier of assessments in 472 an amount that may not exceed 0.5 percent of each carrierâs 473 health benefit plan premiums. 474 b.âExcept as provided in paragraph (f), risk-assuming 475 carriers are exempt from all assessments authorized pursuant to 476 this section. The amount paid by a reinsuring carrier for the 477 first tier of assessments shall be credited against any 478 additional assessments made. 479 c.âThe board shall equitably assess reinsuring carriers for 480 operating losses of the individual account based on market 481 share. The board shall annually assess each carrier a portion of 482 the operating losses of the individual account. The first tier 483 of assessments shall be determined by multiplying the operating 484 losses by a fraction, the numerator of which equals the 485 reinsuring carrierâs earned premium pertaining to direct 486 writings of individual health insurance in the state during the 487 calendar year for which the assessment is levied, and the 488 denominator of which equals the total of all such premiums 489 earned by reinsuring carriers in the state during that calendar 490 year. The second tier of assessments shall be based on the 491 premiums that all carriers, except risk-assuming carriers, 492 earned on all health benefit plans written in this state. The 493 board may levy interim assessments against reinsuring carriers 494 to ensure the financial ability of the plan to cover claims 495 expenses and administrative expenses paid or estimated to be 496 paid in the operation of the plan for the calendar year prior to 497 the associationâs anticipated receipt of annual assessments for 498 that calendar year. Any interim assessment is due and payable 499 within 30 days after receipt by a carrier of the interim 500 assessment notice. Interim assessment payments shall be credited 501 against the carrierâs annual assessment. Health benefit plan 502 premiums and benefits paid by a carrier that are less than an 503 amount determined by the board to justify the cost of collection 504 may not be considered for purposes of determining assessments. 505 d.âSubject to the approval of the office, the board shall 506 adjust the assessment formula for reinsuring carriers that are 507 approved as federally qualified health maintenance organizations 508 by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to 42 509 U.S.C. s. 300e(c)(2)(A) to the extent, if any, that restrictions 510 are placed on them which are not imposed on other carriers. 511 3.âBefore March 1 of each year, the board shall determine 512 and file with the office an estimate of the assessments needed 513 to fund the losses incurred by the program in the individual 514 account for the previous calendar year. 515 4.âIf the board determines that the assessments needed to 516 fund the losses incurred by the program in the individual 517 account for the previous calendar year will exceed the amount 518 specified in subparagraph 2., the board shall evaluate the 519 operation of the program and report its findings and 520 recommendations to the office in the format established in s. 521 627.6699(11) for the comparable report for the small employer 522 reinsurance program. 523 (g)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, the board 524 and the office shall have all powers, duties, and 525 responsibilities with respect to carriers that issue and 526 reinsure individual health insurance, as specified for the board 527 and the office in s. 627.6699(11) with respect to small employer 528 carriers, including, but not limited to, the provisions of s. 529 627.6699(11) relating to: 530 1.âUse of assessments that exceed the amount of actual 531 losses and expenses. 532 2.âThe annual determination of each carrierâs proportion of 533 the assessment. 534 3.âInterest for late payment of assessments. 535 4.âAuthority for the office to approve deferment of an 536 assessment against a carrier. 537 5.âLimited immunity from legal actions or carriers. 538 6.âDevelopment of standards for compensation to be paid to 539 agents. Such standards shall be limited to those specifically 540 enumerated in s. 627.6699(11)(d) s. 627.6699(12)(d). 541 7.âMonitoring compliance by carriers with this section. 542 (8)âSTANDARDS TO ASSURE FAIR MARKETING.â 543 (a)âEach health insurance issuer that offers individual 544 health insurance shall actively market coverage to eligible 545 individuals in the state. The provisions of s. 627.6699(11) s. 546 627.6699(12) that apply to small employer carriers that market 547 policies to small employers shall also apply to health insurance 548 issuers that offer individual health insurance with respect to 549 marketing policies to individuals. 550 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 627.657, Florida 551 Statutes, is amended to read: 552 627.657âProvisions of group health insurance policies.â 553 (2)âThe medical policy as specified in s. 627.6699(3)(j) s. 554 627.6699(3)(k) must be accompanied by an identification card 555 that contains, at a minimum: 556 (a)âThe name of the organization issuing the policy or name 557 of the organization administering the policy, whichever applies. 558 (b)âThe name of the certificateholder. 559 (c)âThe type of plan only if the plan is filed in the 560 state, an indication that the plan is self-funded, or the name 561 of the network. 562 (d)âThe member identification number, contract number, and 563 policy or group number, if applicable. 564 (e)âA contact phone number or electronic address for 565 authorizations and admission certifications. 566 (f)âA phone number or electronic address whereby the 567 covered person or hospital, physician, or other person rendering 568 services covered by the policy may obtain benefits verification 569 and information in order to estimate patient financial 570 responsibility, in compliance with privacy rules under the 571 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act. 572 (g)âThe national plan identifier, in accordance with the 573 compliance date set forth by the federal Department of Health 574 and Human Services. 575 576 The identification card must present the information in a 577 readily identifiable manner or, alternatively, the information 578 may be embedded on the card and available through magnetic 579 stripe or smart card. The information may also be provided 580 through other electronic technology. 581 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 627.66997, Florida 582 Statutes, is amended to read: 583 627.66997âStop-loss insurance.â 584 (1)âA self-insured health benefit plan established or 585 maintained by a small employer, as defined in s. 627.6699(3)(s) 586 s. 627.6699(3)(v), is exempt from s. 627.6699 and may use a 587 stop-loss insurance policy issued to the employer. For purposes 588 of this subsection, the term âstop-loss insurance policyâ means 589 an insurance policy issued to a small employer which covers the 590 small employerâs obligation for the excess cost of medical care 591 on an equivalent basis per employee provided under a self 592 insured health benefit plan. 593 (a)âA small employer stop-loss insurance policy is 594 considered a health insurance policy and is subject to s. 595 627.6699 if the policy has an aggregate attachment point that is 596 lower than the greatest of: 597 1.âTwo thousand dollars multiplied by the number of 598 employees; 599 2.âOne hundred twenty percent of expected claims, as 600 determined by the stop-loss insurer in accordance with actuarial 601 standards of practice; or 602 3.âTwenty thousand dollars. 603 (b)âOnce claims under the small employer health benefit 604 plan reach the aggregate attachment point set forth in paragraph 605 (a), the stop-loss insurance policy authorized under this 606 section must cover 100 percent of all claims that exceed the 607 aggregate attachment point. 608 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.